test/src/morphology/N-kuu29_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kuu: # Noun (29) kuu 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     kuu+N+Sg+Nom: kuu
     kuu+N+Sg+Gen: kuu
     kuu+N+Sg+Par: kuud
     kuu+N+Sg+Ill: [kuuhtõ, kuuhõ]
     kuu+N+Pl+Gen: kuiõ
     kuu+N+Pl+Par: kuid
     kuu+N+Pl+Ill: [kuihtõ, kuihõ]
     kuu+N+Pl+All: [kuilõ, kuiõlõ]
